Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4406
Post-incident management.

Any domestic animal which has bitten any person or caused an abrasion of the skin of any person shall be subjected to post-incident management as provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 6, p. 1486;

Laws 1987, LB 104, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 51, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB25, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB61, § 4.